District of Columbia statutes.
1-325.51

Funds for HIV/AIDS Crisis Area Capacity Building.

(a)

There is established a revolving HIV/AIDS Crisis Area Capacity Building Fund, to be administered by the Mayor, for the purposes of providing loans and grants of up to $500,000 to develop, support, expand, repair, or improve service delivery to persons with HIV/AIDS within those Wards that did not receive grants from the HIV/AIDS Administration during fiscal year 2005.

(b)

There is authorized to be appropriated out of the revenue of the District $500,000 to carry out the purposes of this part.

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 5232, 52 DCR 7503
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5232 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
Short title of subtitle M of title V of Law 16-33: Section 5231 of D.C. Law 16-33 provided that subtitle M of title V of the act may be cited as the HIV/AIDS Crisis Area Capacity Building Fund Act of 2005.
Establishment of Mayor’s Task Force on HIV and AIDS, see Mayor’s Order 2005-198, December 16, 2005 ( 53 DCR 2687).